apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="ئازادی__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ێکی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکەی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکانی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکەی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یەکانی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
	<!-- ZWNJ stuff -->
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ەکە‌ی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="ئاسنگەری"><i>ئاسنگەری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاگاداری"><i>ئاگاداری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="باشی"><i>باشی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="برایەتی"><i>برایەتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بۆیاخچی"><i>بۆیاخچی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بەرزایی"><i>بەرزایی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بەشداری"><i>بەشداری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پارتی"><i>پارتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پەیوەندی"><i>پەیوەندی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تارمایی"><i>تارمایی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تانجی"><i>تانجی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تەنیایی"><i>تەنیایی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جوانی"><i>جوانی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چاپەمەنی"><i>چاپەمەنی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چاوەڕوانی"><i>چاوەڕوانی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="حاجی"><i>حاجی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خزمەتچی"><i>خزمەتچی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خۆشی"><i>خۆشی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="درێژایی"><i>درێژایی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دوایی"><i>دوایی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دەردەسەری"><i>دەردەسەری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕاوچی"><i>ڕاوچی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زۆرانبازی"><i>زۆرانبازی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ساختەچی"><i>ساختەچی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەرخۆیی"><i>سەرخۆیی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەرۆکایەتی"><i>سەرۆکایەتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شارستانێتی"><i>شارستانێتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شایی"><i>شایی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="فاڵچی"><i>فاڵچی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="قامچی"><i>قامچی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="قومارچی"><i>قومارچی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کانی"><i>کانی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کورسی"><i>کورسی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گۆرنی"><i>گۆرنی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لۆری"><i>لۆری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مزگێنی"><i>مزگێنی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ناچاری"><i>ناچاری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ناهەقی"><i>ناهەقی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نەگبەتی"><i>نەگبەتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="یارمەتی"><i>یارمەتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆپی"><i>کۆپی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="یاخی"><i>یاخی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تەنگەنەفەسی"><i>تەنگەنەفەسی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بەشداری"><i>بەشداری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بەرازیلی"><i>بەرازیلی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاودێری"><i>ئاودێری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆری زانیاری"><i>کۆری<b/>زانیاری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دەستدرێژی"><i>دەستدرێژی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گەلی"><i>گەلی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="یەمەنی"><i>یەمەنی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کەری"><i>کەری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەکوادۆری"><i>ئەکوادۆری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="برایەتی"><i>برایەتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاوارەیی"><i>ئاوارەیی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زۆرانبازی"><i>زۆرانبازی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەربەستی"><i>سەربەستی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دەرمانزانی"><i>دەرمانزانی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بایەلۆجی"><i>بایەلۆجی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەستێرەناسی"><i>ئەستێرەناسی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لایەنگیری"><i>لایەنگیری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جوانی"><i>جوانی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خێرایی"><i>خێرایی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پیری"><i>پیری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="یارمەتی"><i>یارمەتی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گۆرەوی"><i>گۆرەوی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نانی بەیانی"><i>نانی<b/>بەیانی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کۆچبەری"><i>کۆچبەری</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شەمەندەفەری ژێرزەمینی"><i>شەمەندەفەری<b/>ژێرزەمینی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هەوکردنی سی"><i>هەوکردنی سی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دەرزی"><i>دەرزی</i><par n="ئازادی__n"/></e>
